Colorado, session 2026A, HB1056.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Improving transparency and integrity in prescription drug
purchasing protects employers and health benefit plan sponsors, supports
patient safety, and reduces unnecessary costs, while preserving clinical
decision-making; and
(b) It is the policy of this state to permit the lawful personal-use
importation of prescription drugs, otherwise known as pharmacy
stewardship programs, optimized sourcing, or international sourcing, in
order to reduce net plan costs without disrupting patient care.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 10-16-171 as
follows:
10-16-171. Pharmacy benefit managers - health-care
consultants - prescription drug optimized sourcing - disclosure
requirements - enforcement - short title - definitions.
(1) Short title. THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS SECTION IS THE
"PRESCRIPTION DRUG OPTIMIZED SOURCING TRANSPARENCY AND
INTEGRITY ACT".
-2- HB26-1056

(2) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION:
(a) "HEALTH-CARE CONSULTANT" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL OR
ENTITY THAT PROVIDES PROFESSIONAL ADVICE, ANALYSIS, OR SERVICES
TO A SELF-INSURED EMPLOYER REGARDING HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN DESIGN
OR ADMINISTRATION, INCLUDING SERVICES RELATED TO PRESCRIPTION
DRUG BENEFITS.
(b) "NATIONAL DRUG CODE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 10-16-122.9 (2)(f).
(c) (I) "PHARMACY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM" MEANS A PROGRAM
OPERATED BY OR ON BEHALF OF A SELF-INSURED EMPLOYER TO OPTIMIZE
THE FINANCIAL PERFORMANCE OF THE SELF-INSURED EMPLOYER'S
PHARMACY BENEFIT WHILE MAINTAINING SAFETY, CONTINUITY OF
THERAPY, AND EQUAL OR LOWER MEMBER COST SHARE. PRESCRIPTIONS
NOT FULFILLED THROUGH THE PHARMACY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM
CONTINUE TO PROCESS UNDER THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN'S EXISTING
PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER, CARRIER, AND NETWORK.
(II) A "PHARMACY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM" INCLUDES THE USE OF
OPTIMIZED SOURCING.
(III) A "PHARMACY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM" IS NOT:
(A) INSURANCE OR A POLICY OF INSURANCE;
(B) A HEALTH PLAN;
(C) A PBM; OR
(D) A THIRD-PARTY ADMINISTRATOR.
(d) (I) "PRESCRIPTION DRUG OPTIMIZED SOURCING PROGRAM"
MEANS A LAWFUL ARRANGEMENT OPERATED BY OR ON BEHALF OF A
SELF-INSURED EMPLOYER UNDER WHICH A DEFINED SUBSET OF
PRESCRIPTION DRUGS FOR COVERED PERSONS MAY BE DISPENSED
-3- HB26-1056

THROUGH CHANNELS OTHER THAN THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN'S
PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER OR CARRIER-ADMINISTERED NETWORK, IF
AUTHORIZED BY FEDERAL LAW, TO REDUCE THE NET PLAN COST WHILE
MAINTAINING PATIENT SAFETY, CONTINUITY OF THERAPY, AND EQUAL OR
LOWER MEMBER COST SHARE. A PRESCRIPTION DRUG OPTIMIZED SOURCING
PROGRAM IS NOT INSURANCE, AND PRESCRIPTIONS NOT FULFILLED
THROUGH THE PROGRAM CONTINUE TO PROCESS UNDER A PLAN'S EXISTING
PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER, CARRIER, AND NETWORK.
(II) "PRESCRIPTION DRUG OPTIMIZED SOURCING PROGRAM"
INCLUDES A PROGRAM FOR IMPORTING PRESCRIPTION DRUGS AUTHORIZED
BY FEDERAL LAW AND FDA REGULATION.
(e) "SELF-INSURED EMPLOYER" MEANS AN EMPLOYER THAT OFFERS
A SELF-INSURED HEALTH PLAN TO ITS EMPLOYEES.
(3) Prohibition against misinformation. A PHARMACY BENEFIT
MANAGER OR HEALTH-CARE CONSULTANT SHALL NOT KNOWINGLY MAKE
OR DISSEMINATE FALSE OR MISLEADING STATEMENTS OR CLAIMS TO AN
EMPLOYER, SELF-INSURED EMPLOYER, OR POLICYHOLDER ABOUT THE
LEGALITY OR SAFETY OF A LAWFUL PRESCRIPTION DRUG OPTIMIZED
SOURCING PROGRAM ESTABLISHED BY A PHARMACY STEWARDSHIP
PROGRAM.
(4) Disclosure requirements.
(a) UPON WRITTEN REQUEST BY A SELF-INSURED EMPLOYER, A
PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER OR HEALTH-CARE CONSULTANT SHALL
PROVIDE DETAILED COST INFORMATION FOR EACH PRESCRIPTION DRUG
DISPENSED UNDER THE PLAN, INCLUDING:
(I) TOTAL DRUG COST PER CLAIM;
(II) TOTAL MEMBER-PAID PORTION PER CLAIM;
-4- HB26-1056

(III) TOTAL PLAN-PAID, SPONSOR-PAID, OR EMPLOYER-PAID
PORTION PER CLAIM; AND
(IV) NATIONAL DRUG CODE, QUANTITY, STRENGTH, AND DAYS OF
SUPPLY.
(b) A PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER OR HEALTH-CARE
CONSULTANT THAT PROVIDES COST INFORMATION PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION SHALL NOT WITHHOLD, EDIT, OR
REDACT THE INFORMATION THAT THE PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER OR
HEALTH-CARE CONSULTANT PROVIDES.
(5) Self-insured employer rights. THIS SECTION DOES NOT
RESTRICT OR LIMIT THE RIGHT OF A SELF-INSURED EMPLOYER TO
PURCHASE PRESCRIPTION DRUGS THROUGH A LAWFUL PRESCRIPTION DRUG
OPTIMIZED SOURCING PROGRAM. A SELF-INSURED EMPLOYER RETAINS THE
RIGHT TO CONTRACT FOR ANY LAWFUL PRESCRIPTION DRUG OPTIMIZED
SOURCING PROGRAM, INCLUDING PERSONAL-USE IMPORTATION PROGRAMS
PERMITTED UNDER FEDERAL LAW, FOR DRUGS USED BY THE SELF-INSURED
EMPLOYER'S HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN'S COVERED PERSONS.
(6) Pharmacy stewardship programs.
(a) A PHARMACY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM THAT IS DESIGNED TO
IMPROVE THE COST-EFFECTIVENESS OF MEDICATION USE WHILE
MAINTAINING PATIENT SAFETY IS RECOGNIZED AS AN EFFECTIVE
COST-CONTAINMENT TOOL.
(b) PHARMACY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAMS AND PRESCRIPTION DRUG
OPTIMIZED SOURCING PROGRAMS ARE AUTHORIZED BY STATE LAW WHEN
IMPLEMENTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL LAW AND WITH THIS
SECTION. SUCH AUTHORIZED PROGRAMS INCLUDE PROGRAMS FOR
IMPORTING PRESCRIPTION DRUGS WHEN AUTHORIZED UNDER FEDERAL
-5- HB26-1056

LAW.
(c) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO CREATE A
NEW INSURANCE PRODUCT OR MANDATORY COVERAGE.
(7) No state cost or self-insured employer mandate.
(a) THIS SECTION DOES NOT:
(I) CREATE A FISCAL REQUIREMENT FOR ANY STATE AGENCY OR AN
APPROPRIATION FROM THE GENERAL FUND;
(II) REQUIRE AN EMPLOYER TO ADOPT OR PARTICIPATE IN A
PRESCRIPTION DRUG OPTIMIZED SOURCING PROGRAM OR PHARMACY
STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM; OR
(III) REQUIRE THAT RESOURCES BE EXPENDED AS A RESULT OF THIS
SECTION.
(b) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION WITHIN
EXISTING APPROPRIATIONS.
(8) Enforcement. THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ENFORCE THIS
SECTION WITH RESPECT TO A PBM OR HEALTH-CARE CONSULTANT THAT
ADMINISTERS OR MANAGES PRESCRIPTION DRUG BENEFITS FOR A HEALTH
BENEFIT PLAN. A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION BY A PBM OR A
HEALTH-CARE CONSULTANT IS AN UNFAIR METHOD OF COMPETITION AND
AN UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE ACT OR PRACTICE IN THE BUSINESS OF
INSURANCE PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-3-1104 (1)(uu). EACH DAY DURING
WHICH A VIOLATION CONTINUES CONSTITUTES A SEPARATE VIOLATION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-3-1104, add
(1)(uu) as follows:
10-3-1104. Unfair methods of competition - unfair or deceptive
practices - rules - definitions. (1) The following are defined as unfair
methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the
-6- HB26-1056

business of insurance:
(uu) VIOLATING SECTION 10-16-171.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to conduct or omissions occurring on or after
the applicable effective date of this act.
-7- HB26-1056